Ohio, session 136, HB70.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. That sections 4501.01, 4505.08, 4513.071, 7
4513.38, and 4513.41 be amended and sections 4503.183 and 8
4505.072 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: 9
Sec. 4501.01. As used in this chapter and Chapters 4503., 10
4505., 4507., 4509., 4510., 4511., 4513., 4515., and 4517. of 11
the Revised Code, and in the penal laws, except as otherwise 12
provided: 13
(A) "Vehicles" means everything on wheels or runners, 14
including motorized bicycles, but does not mean electric 15
personal assistive mobility devices, low-speed micromobility 16
devices, vehicles that are operated exclusively on rails or 17
tracks or from overhead electric trolley wires, and vehicles 18

H. B. No. 70 Page 2
As Introduced
that belong to any police department, municipal fire department, 19
or volunteer fire department, or that are used by such a 20
department in the discharge of its functions. 21
(B) "Motor vehicle" means any vehicle, including mobile 22
homes and recreational vehicles, that is propelled or drawn by 23
power other than muscular power or power collected from overhead 24
electric trolley wires. "Motor vehicle" does not include utility 25
vehicles as defined in division (VV) of this section, under- 26
speed vehicles as defined in division (XX) of this section, 27
mini-trucks as defined in division (BBB) of this section, 28
motorized bicycles, electric bicycles, road rollers, traction 29
engines, power shovels, power cranes, and other equipment used 30
in construction work and not designed for or employed in general 31
highway transportation, well-drilling machinery, ditch-digging 32
machinery, farm machinery, and trailers that are designed and 33
used exclusively to transport a boat between a place of storage 34
and a marina, or in and around a marina, when drawn or towed on 35
a public road or highway for a distance of no more than ten 36
miles and at a speed of twenty-five miles per hour or less. 37
(C) "Agricultural tractor" and "traction engine" mean any 38
self-propelling vehicle that is designed or used for drawing 39
other vehicles or wheeled machinery, but has no provisions for 40
carrying loads independently of such other vehicles, and that is 41
used principally for agricultural purposes. 42
(D) "Commercial tractor," except as defined in division 43
(C) of this section, means any motor vehicle that has motive 44
power and either is designed or used for drawing other motor 45
vehicles, or is designed or used for drawing another motor 46
vehicle while carrying a portion of the other motor vehicle or 47
its load, or both. 48

H. B. No. 70 Page 3
As Introduced
(E) "Passenger car" means any motor vehicle that is 49
designed and used for carrying not more than nine persons and 50
includes any motor vehicle that is designed and used for 51
carrying not more than fifteen persons in a ridesharing 52
arrangement. 53
(F) "Collector's vehicle" means any motor vehicle or 54
agricultural tractor or traction engine that is of special 55
interest, that has a fair market value of one hundred dollars or 56
more, whether operable or not, and that is owned, operated, 57
collected, preserved, restored, maintained, or used essentially 58
as a collector's item, leisure pursuit, or investment, but not 59
as the owner's principal means of transportation. "Licensed 60
collector's vehicle" means a collector's vehicle, other than an 61
agricultural tractor or traction engine, that displays current, 62
valid license tags issued under section 4503.45 of the Revised 63
Code, or a similar type of motor vehicle that displays current, 64
valid license tags issued under substantially equivalent 65
provisions in the laws of other states. 66
(G) "Historical motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle 67
that is over twenty-five years old and is owned solely as a 68
collector's item and for participation in club activities, 69
exhibitions, tours, parades, and similar uses, but that in no 70
event is used for general transportation. 71
(H) "Noncommercial motor vehicle" means any motor vehicle, 72
including a farm truck as defined in section 4503.04 of the 73
Revised Code, that is designed by the manufacturer to carry a 74
load of no more than one ton and is used exclusively for 75
purposes other than engaging in business for profit. 76
(I) "Bus" means any motor vehicle that has motor power and 77
is designed and used for carrying more than nine passengers, 78

H. B. No. 70 Page 4
As Introduced
except any motor vehicle that is designed and used for carrying 79
not more than fifteen passengers in a ridesharing arrangement. 80
(J) "Commercial car" or "truck" means any motor vehicle 81
that has motor power and is designed and used for carrying 82
merchandise or freight, or that is used as a commercial tractor. 83
(K) "Bicycle" means every device, other than a device that 84
is designed solely for use as a play vehicle by a child, that is 85
propelled solely by human power upon which a person may ride, 86
and that has two or more wheels, any of which is more than 87
fourteen inches in diameter. 88
(L) "Motorized bicycle" or "moped" means any vehicle that 89
either has two tandem wheels or one wheel in the front and two 90
wheels in the rear, that may be pedaled, and that is equipped 91
with a helper motor of not more than fifty cubic centimeters 92
piston displacement that produces no more than one brake 93
horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a speed 94
of no greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. 95
"Motorized bicycle" or "moped" does not include an electric 96
bicycle. 97
(M) "Trailer" means any vehicle without motive power that 98
is designed or used for carrying property or persons wholly on 99
its own structure and for being drawn by a motor vehicle, and 100
includes any such vehicle that is formed by or operated as a 101
combination of a semitrailer and a vehicle of the dolly type 102
such as that commonly known as a trailer dolly, a vehicle used 103
to transport agricultural produce or agricultural production 104
materials between a local place of storage or supply and the 105
farm when drawn or towed on a public road or highway at a speed 106
greater than twenty-five miles per hour, and a vehicle that is 107
designed and used exclusively to transport a boat between a 108

H. B. No. 70 Page 5
As Introduced
place of storage and a marina, or in and around a marina, when 109
drawn or towed on a public road or highway for a distance of 110
more than ten miles or at a speed of more than twenty-five miles 111
per hour. "Trailer" does not include a manufactured home or 112
travel trailer. 113
(N) "Noncommercial trailer" means any trailer, except a 114
travel trailer or trailer that is used to transport a boat as 115
described in division (B) of this section, but, where 116
applicable, includes a vehicle that is used to transport a boat 117
as described in division (M) of this section, that has a gross 118
weight of no more than ten thousand pounds, and that is used 119
exclusively for purposes other than engaging in business for a 120
profit, such as the transportation of personal items for 121
personal or recreational purposes. 122
(O) "Mobile home" means a building unit or assembly of 123
closed construction that is fabricated in an off-site facility, 124
is more than thirty-five body feet in length or, when erected on 125
site, is three hundred twenty or more square feet, is built on a 126
permanent chassis, is transportable in one or more sections, and 127
does not qualify as a manufactured home as defined in division 128
(C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code or as an 129
industrialized unit as defined in division (C)(3) of section 130
3781.06 of the Revised Code. 131
(P) "Semitrailer" means any vehicle of the trailer type 132
that does not have motive power and is so designed or used with 133
another and separate motor vehicle that in operation a part of 134
its own weight or that of its load, or both, rests upon and is 135
carried by the other vehicle furnishing the motive power for 136
propelling itself and the vehicle referred to in this division, 137
and includes, for the purpose only of registration and taxation 138

H. B. No. 70 Page 6
As Introduced
under those chapters, any vehicle of the dolly type, such as a 139
trailer dolly, that is designed or used for the conversion of a 140
semitrailer into a trailer. 141
(Q) "Recreational vehicle" means a vehicular portable 142
structure that meets all of the following conditions: 143
(1) It is designed for the sole purpose of recreational 144
travel. 145
(2) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in business 146
for profit. 147
(3) It is not used for the purpose of engaging in 148
intrastate commerce. 149
(4) It is not used for the purpose of commerce as defined 150
in 49 C.F.R. 383.5, as amended. 151
(5) It is not regulated by the public utilities commission 152
pursuant to Chapter 4905., 4921., or 4923. of the Revised Code. 153
(6) It is classed as one of the following: 154
(a) "Travel trailer" or "house vehicle" means a nonself- 155
propelled recreational vehicle that does not exceed an overall 156
length of forty feet, exclusive of bumper and tongue or 157
coupling. "Travel trailer" includes a tent-type fold-out camping 158
trailer as defined in section 4517.01 of the Revised Code. 159
(b) "Motor home" means a self-propelled recreational 160
vehicle that has no fifth wheel and is constructed with 161
permanently installed facilities for cold storage, cooking and 162
consuming of food, and for sleeping. 163
(c) "Truck camper" means a nonself-propelled recreational 164
vehicle that does not have wheels for road use and is designed 165

H. B. No. 70 Page 7
As Introduced
to be placed upon and attached to a motor vehicle. "Truck 166
camper" does not include truck covers that consist of walls and 167
a roof, but do not have floors and facilities enabling them to 168
be used as a dwelling. 169
(d) "Fifth wheel trailer" means a vehicle that is of such 170
size and weight as to be movable without a special highway 171
permit, that is constructed with a raised forward section that 172
allows a bi-level floor plan, and that is designed to be towed 173
by a vehicle equipped with a fifth-wheel hitch ordinarily 174
installed in the bed of a truck. 175
(e) "Park trailer" means a vehicle that is commonly known 176
as a park model recreational vehicle, meets the American 177
national standard institute standard A119.5 (1988) for park 178
trailers, is built on a single chassis, has a gross trailer area 179
of four hundred square feet or less when set up, is designed for 180
seasonal or temporary living quarters, and may be connected to 181
utilities necessary for the operation of installed features and 182
appliances. 183
(R) "Pneumatic tires" means tires of rubber and fabric or 184
tires of similar material, that are inflated with air. 185
(S) "Solid tires" means tires of rubber or similar elastic 186
material that are not dependent upon confined air for support of 187
the load. 188
(T) "Solid tire vehicle" means any vehicle that is 189
equipped with two or more solid tires. 190
(U) "Farm machinery" means all machines and tools that are 191
used in the production, harvesting, and care of farm products, 192
and includes trailers that are used to transport agricultural 193
produce or agricultural production materials between a local 194

H. B. No. 70 Page 8
As Introduced
place of storage or supply and the farm, agricultural tractors, 195
threshing machinery, hay-baling machinery, corn shellers, 196
hammermills, and machinery used in the production of 197
horticultural, agricultural, and vegetable products. 198
(V) "Owner" includes any person or firm, other than a 199
manufacturer or dealer, that has title to a motor vehicle, 200
except that, in sections 4505.01 to 4505.19 of the Revised Code, 201
"owner" includes in addition manufacturers and dealers. 202
(W) "Manufacturer" and "dealer" include all persons and 203
firms that are regularly engaged in the business of 204
manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or 205
dealing in motor vehicles, at an established place of business 206
that is used exclusively for the purpose of manufacturing, 207
selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor 208
vehicles. A place of business that is used for manufacturing, 209
selling, displaying, offering for sale, or dealing in motor 210
vehicles shall be deemed to be used exclusively for those 211
purposes even though snowmobiles or all-purpose vehicles are 212
sold or displayed for sale thereat, even though farm machinery 213
is sold or displayed for sale thereat, or even though repair, 214
accessory, gasoline and oil, storage, parts, service, or paint 215
departments are maintained thereat, or, in any county having a 216
population of less than seventy-five thousand at the last 217
federal census, even though a department in a place of business 218
is used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor vehicles by 219
means of used parts, if such departments are operated for the 220
purpose of furthering and assisting in the business of 221
manufacturing, selling, displaying, offering for sale, or 222
dealing in motor vehicles. Places of business or departments in 223
a place of business used to dismantle, salvage, or rebuild motor 224
vehicles by means of using used parts are not considered as 225

H. B. No. 70 Page 9
As Introduced
being maintained for the purpose of assisting or furthering the 226
manufacturing, selling, displaying, and offering for sale or 227
dealing in motor vehicles. 228
(X) "Operator" includes any person who drives or operates 229
a motor vehicle upon the public highways. 230
(Y) "Chauffeur" means any operator who operates a motor 231
vehicle, other than a taxicab, as an employee for hire; or any 232
operator whether or not the owner of a motor vehicle, other than 233
a taxicab, who operates such vehicle for transporting, for gain, 234
compensation, or profit, either persons or property owned by 235
another. Any operator of a motor vehicle who is voluntarily 236
involved in a ridesharing arrangement is not considered an 237
employee for hire or operating such vehicle for gain, 238
compensation, or profit. 239
(Z) "State" includes the territories and federal districts 240
of the United States, and the provinces of Canada. 241
(AA) "Public roads and highways" for vehicles includes all 242
public thoroughfares, bridges, and culverts. 243
(BB) "Manufacturer's number" means the manufacturer's 244
original serial number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the 245
chassis or other part of the motor vehicle. 246
(CC) "Motor number" means the manufacturer's original 247
number that is affixed to or imprinted upon the engine or motor 248
of the vehicle. 249
(DD) "Distributor" means any person who is authorized by a 250
motor vehicle manufacturer to distribute new motor vehicles to 251
licensed motor vehicle dealers at an established place of 252
business that is used exclusively for the purpose of 253
distributing new motor vehicles to licensed motor vehicle 254

H. B. No. 70 Page 10
As Introduced
dealers, except when the distributor also is a new motor vehicle 255
dealer, in which case the distributor may distribute at the 256
location of the distributor's licensed dealership. 257
(EE) "Ridesharing arrangement" means the transportation of 258
persons in a motor vehicle where the transportation is 259
incidental to another purpose of a volunteer driver and includes 260
ridesharing arrangements known as carpools, vanpools, and 261
buspools. 262
(FF) "Apportionable vehicle" means any vehicle that is 263
used or intended for use in two or more international 264
registration plan member jurisdictions that allocate or 265
proportionally register vehicles, that is used for the 266
transportation of persons for hire or designed, used, or 267
maintained primarily for the transportation of property, and 268
that meets any of the following qualifications: 269
(1) Is a power unit having a gross vehicle weight in 270
excess of twenty-six thousand pounds; 271
(2) Is a power unit having three or more axles, regardless 272
of the gross vehicle weight; 273
(3) Is a combination vehicle with a gross vehicle weight 274
in excess of twenty-six thousand pounds. 275
"Apportionable vehicle" does not include recreational 276
vehicles, vehicles displaying restricted plates, city pick-up 277
and delivery vehicles, or vehicles owned and operated by the 278
United States, this state, or any political subdivisions 279
thereof. 280
(GG) "Chartered party" means a group of persons who 281
contract as a group to acquire the exclusive use of a passenger- 282
carrying motor vehicle at a fixed charge for the vehicle in 283

H. B. No. 70 Page 11
As Introduced
accordance with the carrier's tariff, lawfully on file with the 284
United States department of transportation, for the purpose of 285
group travel to a specified destination or for a particular 286
itinerary, either agreed upon in advance or modified by the 287
chartered group after having left the place of origin. 288
(HH) "International registration plan" means a reciprocal 289
agreement of member jurisdictions that is endorsed by the 290
American association of motor vehicle administrators, and that 291
promotes and encourages the fullest possible use of the highway 292
system by authorizing apportioned registration of fleets of 293
vehicles and recognizing registration of vehicles apportioned in 294
member jurisdictions. 295
(II) "Restricted plate" means a license plate that has a 296
restriction of time, geographic area, mileage, or commodity, and 297
includes license plates issued to farm trucks under division (J) 298
of section 4503.04 of the Revised Code. 299
(JJ) "Gross vehicle weight," with regard to any commercial 300
car, trailer, semitrailer, or bus that is taxed at the rates 301
established under section 4503.042 or 4503.65 of the Revised 302
Code, means the unladen weight of the vehicle fully equipped 303
plus the maximum weight of the load to be carried on the 304
vehicle. 305
(KK) "Combined gross vehicle weight" with regard to any 306
combination of a commercial car, trailer, and semitrailer, that 307
is taxed at the rates established under section 4503.042 or 308
4503.65 of the Revised Code, means the total unladen weight of 309
the combination of vehicles fully equipped plus the maximum 310
weight of the load to be carried on that combination of 311
vehicles. 312

H. B. No. 70 Page 12
As Introduced
(LL) "Chauffeured limousine" means a motor vehicle that is 313
designed to carry nine or fewer passengers and is operated for 314
hire pursuant to a prearranged contract for the transportation 315
of passengers on public roads and highways along a route under 316
the control of the person hiring the vehicle and not over a 317
defined and regular route. "Prearranged contract" means an 318
agreement, made in advance of boarding, to provide 319
transportation from a specific location in a chauffeured 320
limousine. "Chauffeured limousine" does not include any vehicle 321
that is used exclusively in the business of funeral directing. 322
(MM) "Manufactured home" has the same meaning as in 323
division (C)(4) of section 3781.06 of the Revised Code. 324
(NN) "Acquired situs," with respect to a manufactured home 325
or a mobile home, means to become located in this state by the 326
placement of the home on real property, but does not include the 327
placement of a manufactured home or a mobile home in the 328
inventory of a new motor vehicle dealer or the inventory of a 329
manufacturer, remanufacturer, or distributor of manufactured or 330
mobile homes. 331
(OO) "Electronic" includes electrical, digital, magnetic, 332
optical, electromagnetic, or any other form of technology that 333
entails capabilities similar to these technologies. 334
(PP) "Electronic record" means a record generated, 335
communicated, received, or stored by electronic means for use in 336
an information system or for transmission from one information 337
system to another. 338
(QQ) "Electronic signature" means a signature in 339
electronic form attached to or logically associated with an 340
electronic record. 341

H. B. No. 70 Page 13
As Introduced
(RR) "Financial transaction device" has the same meaning 342
as in division (A) of section 113.40 of the Revised Code. 343
(SS) "Electronic motor vehicle dealer" means a motor 344
vehicle dealer licensed under Chapter 4517. of the Revised Code 345
whom the registrar of motor vehicles determines meets the 346
criteria designated in section 4503.035 of the Revised Code for 347
electronic motor vehicle dealers and designates as an electronic 348
motor vehicle dealer under that section. 349
(TT) "Electric personal assistive mobility device" means a 350
self-balancing two non-tandem wheeled device that is designed to 351
transport only one person, has an electric propulsion system of 352
an average of seven hundred fifty watts, and when ridden on a 353
paved level surface by an operator who weighs one hundred 354
seventy pounds has a maximum speed of less than twenty miles per 355
hour. 356
(UU) "Limited driving privileges" means the privilege to 357
operate a motor vehicle that a court grants under section 358
4510.021 of the Revised Code to a person whose driver's or 359
commercial driver's license or permit or nonresident operating 360
privilege has been suspended. 361
(VV) "Utility vehicle" means a self-propelled vehicle 362
designed with a bed, principally for the purpose of transporting 363
material or cargo in connection with construction, agricultural, 364
forestry, grounds maintenance, lawn and garden, materials 365
handling, or similar activities. 366
(WW) "Low-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled 367
motor vehicle with an attainable speed in one mile on a paved 368
level surface of more than twenty miles per hour but not more 369
than twenty-five miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight 370

H. B. No. 70 Page 14
As Introduced
rating less than three thousand pounds. 371
(XX) "Under-speed vehicle" means a three- or four-wheeled 372
vehicle, including a vehicle commonly known as a golf cart, with 373
an attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than 374
twenty miles per hour and with a gross vehicle weight rating 375
less than three thousand pounds. 376
(YY) "Motor-driven cycle or motor scooter" means any 377
vehicle designed to travel on not more than three wheels in 378
contact with the ground, with a seat for the driver and floor 379
pad for the driver's feet, and is equipped with a motor with a 380
piston displacement between fifty and one hundred cubic 381
centimeters piston displacement that produces not more than five 382
brake horsepower and is capable of propelling the vehicle at a 383
speed greater than twenty miles per hour on a level surface. 384
(ZZ) "Motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with motive power 385
having a seat or saddle for the use of the operator, designed to 386
travel on not more than three wheels in contact with the ground, 387
and having no occupant compartment top or occupant compartment 388
top that can be installed or removed by the user. 389
(AAA) "Cab-enclosed motorcycle" means a motor vehicle with 390
motive power having a seat or saddle for the use of the 391
operator, designed to travel on not more than three wheels in 392
contact with the ground, and having an occupant compartment top 393
or an occupant compartment top that is installed. 394
(BBB) "Mini-truck" means a vehicle that has four wheels, 395
is propelled by an electric motor with a rated power of seven 396
thousand five hundred watts or less or an internal combustion 397
engine with a piston displacement capacity of six hundred sixty 398
cubic centimeters or less, has a total dry weight of nine 399

H. B. No. 70 Page 15
As Introduced
hundred to two thousand two hundred pounds, contains an enclosed 400
cabin and a seat for the vehicle operator, resembles a pickup 401
truck or van with a cargo area or bed located at the rear of the 402
vehicle, and was not originally manufactured to meet federal 403
motor vehicle safety standards. 404
(CCC) "Autocycle" means a three-wheeled motorcycle that is 405
manufactured to comply with federal safety requirements for 406
motorcycles and that is equipped with safety belts, a steering 407
wheel, and seating that does not require the operator to 408
straddle or sit astride to ride the motorcycle. 409
(DDD) "Plug-in hybrid electric motor vehicle" means a 410
passenger car powered in part by a battery cell energy system 411
that can be recharged via an external source of electricity. 412
(EEE) "Hybrid motor vehicle" means a passenger car powered 413
by an internal propulsion system consisting of both of the 414
following: 415
(1) A combustion engine; 416
(2) A battery cell energy system that cannot be recharged 417
via an external source of electricity but can be recharged by 418
other vehicle mechanisms that capture and store electric energy. 419
(FFF) "Low-speed micromobility device" means a device 420
weighing less than one hundred pounds that has handlebars, is 421
propelled by an electric motor or human power, and has an 422
attainable speed on a paved level surface of not more than 423
twenty miles per hour when propelled by the electric motor. 424
(GGG) "Specialty license plate" means a license plate, 425
authorized by the general assembly, that displays a combination 426
of words, markings, logos, or other graphic artwork that is in 427
addition to the words, images, and distinctive numbers and 428

H. B. No. 70 Page 16
As Introduced
letters required by section 4503.22 of the Revised Code. 429
(HHH) "Battery electric motor vehicle" means a passenger 430
car powered wholly by a battery cell energy system that can be 431
recharged via an external source of electricity. 432
(III) "Adaptive mobility vehicle" means either a new 433
passenger car or bus purchased from a new motor vehicle dealer 434
or a used passenger car or bus, provided that such passenger car 435
or bus is designed, modified, or equipped to enable an 436
individual with a disability to operate or to be transported in 437
the passenger car or bus, in accordance with 49 C.F.R. part 568 438
or 595, and contains at least one of the following: 439
(1) An electronic or mechanical lift that enables a person 440
to enter or exit the motor vehicle while occupying a wheelchair 441
or scooter; 442
(2) An electronic or mechanical wheelchair ramp; 443
(3) A system to secure a wheelchair or scooter in order to 444
allow a person to operate or be transported safely while 445
occupying that wheelchair or scooter. 446
(JJJ) "Replica motor vehicle" means a motor vehicle that 447
is constructed, assembled, or modified so as to replicate the 448
make, model, and model year of a motor vehicle that is at least 449
twenty-five years old. 450
Sec. 4503.183. (A) No person shall use a replica motor 451
vehicle for general transportation. However, a person may 452
operate a replica motor vehicle registered under this section on 453
the public roads and highways as follows: 454
(1) For club activities, exhibitions, tours, parades, and 455
similar uses; 456

H. B. No. 70 Page 17
As Introduced
(2) To and from a location where maintenance is performed 457
on the replica motor vehicle. 458
(B) In lieu of the annual license tax levied in sections 459
4503.02 and 4503.04 of the Revised Code, the registrar of motor 460
vehicles or a deputy registrar shall collect a license fee of 461
ten dollars for the registration of a replica motor vehicle 462
under this section. The fee shall be deposited into the public 463
safety - highway purposes fund established in section 4501.06 of 464
the Revised Code. 465
(C) A person who owns a replica motor vehicle and applies 466
for registration and a replica license plate under this section 467
shall execute an affidavit that the replica motor vehicle for 468
which the plate is requested is owned and operated solely for 469
the purposes enumerated in division (A) of this section. The 470
affidavit also shall set forth that the replica motor vehicle 471
has been inspected and found safe to operate on the public roads 472
and highways in the state. No registration issued pursuant to 473
this section need specify the weight of the replica motor 474
vehicle. 475
(D) The owner of a replica motor vehicle registered under 476
this section shall display in plain view on the rear of the 477
replica motor vehicle a replica license plate issued by the 478
registrar. A replica license plate shall not display a date, but 479
shall display the inscription "Replica Motor Vehicle--Ohio" and 480
the registration number assigned to that replica motor vehicle. 481
(E) A replica license plate is valid without renewal as 482
long as the replica motor vehicle for which it was issued or 483
procured is in existence. A replica license plate is issued for 484
the owner's use only for such replica motor vehicle unless later 485
transferred to another replica motor vehicle owned by that 486

H. B. No. 70 Page 18
As Introduced
person. In order to effect such a transfer, the owner of the 487
replica motor vehicle that originally displayed the replica 488
license plate shall comply with division (C) of this section. In 489
the event of a transfer of title, the transferor shall surrender 490
the replica license plate or transfer it to another replica 491
motor vehicle owned by the transferor. The registrar may revoke 492
any replica license plate issued under this section, for cause 493
shown and after a hearing, for failure of the applicant to 494
comply with this section. Upon revocation, a replica license 495
plate shall be surrendered. 496
Sec. 4505.072. (A) The owner of a motor vehicle seeking t o 497
obtain a certificate of title indicating that the motor vehicle 498
is a replica motor vehicle shall do all of the following: 499
(1) Have that motor vehicle inspected by the state highway 500
patrol in the manner specified in section 4505.111 of the 501
Revised Code and obtain an inspection report from the state 502
highway patrol; 503
(2) Obtain a signed written statement from a person or 504
nonprofit corporation with expertise in historical motor 505
vehicles that the owner's motor vehicle reasonably replicates 506
the make, model, and model year of motor vehicle that the owner 507
is intending to replicate; 508
(3) Sign the written statement and have it notarized by a 509
notary public. 510
(B) When a clerk of a court of common pleas issues a 511
physical or electronic certificate of title for a motor vehicle, 512
the owner of the motor vehicle may request that the certificate 513
of title indicate that the motor vehicle is a replica motor 514
vehicle. 515

H. B. No. 70 Page 19
As Introduced
When a clerk of a court of common pleas issues a duplicate 516
certificate of title or memorandum certificate of title for a 517
replica motor vehicle, that certificate of title shall be 518
identical to the existing certificate of title. 519
Prior to issuance of the certificate of title, the owner 520
of the replica motor vehicle shall surrender to the clerk any 521
existing certificate of title, a copy of the inspection report, 522
and the signed notarized written statement described in division 523
(A) of this section. 524
(C)(1) Upon compliance with divisions (A) and (B) of this 525
section and payment of the fee prescribed in section 4505.09 of 526
the Revised Code, the clerk shall issue to the owner a 527
certificate of title that complies with this section. 528
(2) The clerk shall use reasonable care in performing the 529
duties imposed on the clerk by this section in issuing a 530
certificate of title pursuant to this section, but the clerk is 531
not liable for any of the clerk's errors or omissions or those 532
of the clerk's deputies, or the automated title processing 533
system in the performance of those duties. 534
(D)(1) The registrar of motor vehicles shall ensure that 535
the certificate of title of a replica motor vehicle issued under 536
this section complies with all of the following: 537
(a) It is in the same form as the original certificate of 538
title. 539
(b) It displays the word "REPLICA" in black boldface 540
letters on its face. 541
(c) It includes the make, model, and model year of motor 542
vehicle that the owner is intending the motor vehicle to 543
replicate. 544

H. B. No. 70 Page 20
As Introduced
(d) It includes the year the replica motor vehicle was 545
constructed, assembled, or modified. 546
(2) The registrar shall determine the exact location on 547
the face of the certificate of title of the word "REPLICA," the 548
make, model, and model year of motor vehicle the owner is 549
intending to replicate, and the year the replica motor vehicle 550
was constructed, assembled, or modified. The registrar shall 551
develop an automated procedure within the automated title 552
processing system for purposes of this section. 553
(3) Every memorandum certificate of title or duplicate 554
certificate of title issued for a replica motor vehicle for 555
which a certificate of title has been issued under this section 556
shall display the same information as is required under division 557
(D)(1) of this section. 558
Any subsequent certificate of title issued for a replica 559
motor vehicle for which a certificate of title has been issued 560
under this section shall display the same information as is 561
required under division (D)(1) of this section. 562
(E)(1) The owner of a replica motor vehicle who titles 563
that vehicle as a replica motor vehicle under this section shall 564
obtain replica license plates and comply with the requirements 565
of section 4503.183 of the Revised Code. 566
(2) The owner of a replica motor vehicle who does not 567
title that motor vehicle as a replica motor vehicle under this 568
section is not required to obtain replica motor vehicle license 569
plates and comply with the requirements of section 4503.183 of 570
the Revised Code. Such an owner is subject to the general 571
registration requirements of Chapter 4503., the titling 572
requirements of Chapter 4505., and the equipment requirements of 573

H. B. No. 70 Page 21
As Introduced
Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code. 574
Sec. 4505.08. (A) When the clerk of a court of common 575
pleas issues a physical certificate of title, the clerk shall 576
issue the certificate of title on a form and in a manner 577
prescribed by the registrar of motor vehicles. The clerk shall 578
file a copy of the physical evidence for the creation of the 579
certificate of title in a manner prescribed by the registrar. A 580
clerk may retain digital images of documents used as evidence 581
for issuance of a certificate of title. Certified printouts of 582
documents retained as digital images shall have the same 583
evidentiary value as the original physical documents. The record 584
of the issuance of the certificate of title shall be maintained 585
in the automated title processing system. The clerk shall sign 586
and affix the clerk's seal to the original certificate of title 587
and, if there are no liens on the motor vehicle, shall deliver 588
the certificate to the applicant or the selling dealer. If there 589
are one or more liens on the motor vehicle, the certificate of 590
title shall be delivered to the holder of the first lien or the 591
selling dealer, who shall deliver the certificate of title to 592
the holder of the first lien. 593
The registrar shall prescribe a uniform method of 594
numbering certificates of title, and such numbering shall be in 595
such manner that the county of issuance is indicated. The clerk 596
shall assign numbers to certificates of title in the manner 597
prescribed by the registrar. The clerk shall file all 598
certificates of title according to rules to be prescribed by the 599
registrar, and the clerk shall maintain in the clerk's office 600
indexes for the certificates of title. 601
The clerk need not retain on file any current certificates 602
of title, current duplicate certificates of title, current 603

H. B. No. 70 Page 22
As Introduced
memorandum certificates of title, or current salvage 604
certificates of title, or supporting evidence of them covering 605
any motor vehicle or manufactured or mobile home for a period 606
longer than seven years after the date of its filing; 607
thereafter, the documents and supporting evidence may be 608
destroyed. The clerk need not retain on file any inactive 609
records, including certificates of title, duplicate certificates 610
of title, or memorandum certificates of title, or supporting 611
evidence of them, including the electronic record described in 612
division (A) of section 4505.06 of the Revised Code, covering 613
any motor vehicle or manufactured or mobile home for a period 614
longer than five years after the date of its filing; thereafter, 615
the documents and supporting evidence may be destroyed. 616
The automated title processing system shall contain all 617
active records and an index of the active records, a record and 618
index of all inactive titles for ten years, and a record and 619
index of all inactive titles for manufactured and mobile homes 620
for thirty years. If the clerk provides a written copy of any 621
information contained in the database, the copy shall be 622
considered the original for purposes of the clerk certifying the 623
record of the information for use in any legal proceeding. 624
(B)(1) If the clerk issues a certificate of title for a 625
motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another 626
state, the clerk shall record verbatim, where practicable, in 627
the space on the title described in division (B)(19) of section 628
4505.07 of the Revised Code, the words that appear as a notation 629
to the vehicle on the title issued by the previous state. These 630
notations may include, but are not limited to, words to the 631
effect that the vehicle was considered or was categorized by the 632
state in which it was last previously registered to be a law 633
enforcement vehicle or a taxicab or was once in a flood. 634

H. B. No. 70 Page 23
As Introduced
(2) If the clerk, while issuing a certificate of title for 635
a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another 636
state, receives information from the automated title processing 637
system indicating that a title to the vehicle previously was 638
issued by this state and that the previous title contained 639
notations that appeared in the space described in division (B) 640
(19) or (20) of section 4505.07 of the Revised Code, the clerk 641
shall enter the notations that appeared on the previous 642
certificate of title issued by this state on the new certificate 643
of title in the space described in division (B)(19) or (20) of 644
section 4505.07 of the Revised Code, irrespective of whether the 645
notations appear on the certificate of title issued by the state 646
in which the vehicle was last previously registered. 647
(3) If the clerk, while issuing a certificate of title for 648
a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another 649
state, receives information from the automated title processing 650
system indicating that the vehicle was previously issued a title 651
by this state and that the previous title bore the notation 652
"REBUILT SALVAGE" as required by division (E) of section 4505.11 653
of the Revised Code, or the previous title to the vehicle issued 654
by this state was a salvage certificate of title, the clerk 655
shall cause the certificate of title the clerk issues to bear 656
the notation "REBUILT SALVAGE" in the location prescribed by the 657
registrar pursuant to that division. 658
(4) If the clerk, while issuing a certificate of title for 659
a motor vehicle that was last previously registered in another 660
state, receives information from the automated title processing 661
system indicating that the vehicle was previously issued a title 662
by this state and that the previous title included the notation 663
"REPLICA" in accordance with section 4505.072 of the Revised 664
Code, or the previous title to the vehicle issued by another 665

H. B. No. 70 Page 24
As Introduced
state indicates that the vehicle is a replica motor vehicle, the 666
clerk shall cause the certificate of title the clerk issues to 667
display the notation "REPLICA" in the location prescribed by the 668
registrar pursuant to that section. 669
(C) When the clerk issues a certificate of title for a 670
motor vehicle that was last previously registered in this state 671
and was a law enforcement vehicle or a taxicab or was once in a 672
flood, the clerk shall record that information in the space on 673
the title described in division (B)(20) of section 4505.07 of 674
the Revised Code. The registrar, by rule, may prescribe any 675
additional uses of or happenings to a motor vehicle that the 676
registrar has reason to believe should be noted on the 677
certificate of title as provided in this division. 678
(D) The clerk shall use reasonable care in recording or 679
entering onto titles the clerk issues any notation and 680
information the clerk is required by divisions (B) and (C) of 681
this section to record or enter and in causing the titles the 682
clerk issues to bear any notation required by those divisions, 683
but the clerk is not liable for any of the clerk's errors or 684
omissions or those of the clerk's deputies, or the automated 685
title processing system, in the performance of the duties 686
imposed on the clerk by this section. 687
(E) The clerk may issue a duplicate title, when duly 688
applied for, of any title that has been destroyed as herein 689
provided. 690
(F) Except as provided in section 4505.021 of the Revised 691
Code, the clerk shall issue a physical certificate of title to 692
an applicant unless the applicant specifically requests the 693
clerk not to issue a physical certificate of title and instead 694
to issue an electronic certificate of title. The fact that a 695

H. B. No. 70 Page 25
As Introduced
physical certificate of title is not issued for a motor vehicle 696
does not affect ownership of the vehicle. In that case, when the 697
clerk completes the process of entering certificate of title 698
application information into the automated title processing 699
system, the effect of the completion of the process is the same 700
as if the clerk actually issued a physical certificate of title 701
for the motor vehicle. 702
(G) An electronic motor vehicle dealer who applies for a 703
certificate of title on behalf of a customer who purchases a 704
motor vehicle from the dealer may print a non-negotiable 705
evidence of ownership for the customer if the customer so 706
requests. The authorization to print the non-negotiable evidence 707
of ownership shall come from the clerk with whom the dealer 708
makes application for the certificate of title for the customer, 709
but the printing by the dealer does not create an agency 710
relationship of any kind between the dealer and the clerk. 711
(H) The owner of a motor vehicle may apply at any time to 712
a clerk of a court of common pleas for a non-negotiable evidence 713
of ownership for the motor vehicle. 714
(I) In accordance with rules adopted by the registrar, a 715
clerk may issue a certificate of title applied for by an agent 716
of a licensed motor vehicle dealer when that agent has a 717
properly executed power of attorney from the dealer. 718
Sec. 4513.071. (A) Every motor vehicle, trailer, 719
semitrailer, and pole trailer when operated upon a highway shall 720
be equipped with two or more stop lights, except that passenger 721
cars manufactured or assembled prior to January 1, 1967, 722
motorcycles, and motor-driven cycles shall be equipped with at 723
least one stop light. Stop lights shall be mounted on the rear 724
of the vehicle, actuated upon application of the service brake, 725

H. B. No. 70 Page 26
As Introduced
and may be incorporated with other rear lights. Such stop lights 726
when actuated shall emit a red light visible from a distance of 727
five hundred feet to the rear, provided that in the case of a 728
train of vehicles only the stop lights on the rear-most vehicle 729
need be visible from the distance specified. 730
Such stop lights when actuated shall give a steady warning 731
light to the rear of a vehicle or train of vehicles to indicate 732
the intention of the operator to diminish the speed of or stop a 733
vehicle or train of vehicles. 734
When stop lights are used as required by this section, 735
they shall be constructed or installed so as to provide adequate 736
and reliable illumination and shall conform to the appropriate 737
rules and regulations established under section 4513.19 of the 738
Revised Code. 739
Historical A historical motor vehicles as defined in 740
section 4503.181 of the Revised Code, vehicle that was not 741
originally manufactured with stop lights, are or a replica motor 742
vehicle that replicates a motor vehicle that was not originally 743
manufactured with stop lights is not subject to this section. 744
(B) Whoever violates this section is guilty of a minor 745
misdemeanor. 746
(C) As used in this section, "replica motor vehicle" means 747
a replica motor vehicle for which a certificate of title is 748
issued under section 4505.072 of the Revised Code. 749
Sec. 4513.38. (A) No person shall be prohibited from 750
owning or operating a licensed collector's vehicle or, 751
historical motor vehicle, or replica motor vehicle that is 752
equipped with a feature of design, type of material, or article 753
of equipment that was not in violation of any motor vehicle 754

H. B. No. 70 Page 27
As Introduced
equipment law of this state or of its political subdivisions in 755
effect during the calendar year the vehicle was manufactured or 756
the calendar year that it replicates, and no licensed 757
collector's vehicle or, historical motor vehicle, or replica 758
motor vehicle shall be prohibited from displaying or using any 759
such feature of design, type of material, or article of 760
equipment. 761
No person shall be prohibited from owning or operating a 762
licensed collector's vehicle or, historical motor vehicle, or 763
replica motor vehicle for failing to comply with an equipment 764
provision contained in Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code or in 765
any state rule that was enacted or adopted in a year subsequent 766
to that in which the vehicle was manufactured or the calendar 767
year that it replicates, and no licensed collector's vehicle or, 768
historical motor vehicle, or replica motor vehicle shall be 769
required to comply with an equipment provision enacted into 770
Chapter 4513. of the Revised Code or adopted by state rule 771
subsequent to the calendar year in which it was manufactured or 772
the calendar year that it replicates. No political subdivision 773
shall require an owner of a licensed collector's vehicle or, 774
historical motor vehicle, or replica motor vehicle to comply 775
with equipment provisions contained in laws or rules that were 776
enacted or adopted subsequent to the calendar year in which the 777
vehicle was manufactured or the calendar year that it 778
replicates, and no political subdivision shall prohibit the 779
operation of a licensed collector's vehicle or, historical motor 780
vehicle, or replica motor vehicle for failure to comply with any 781
such equipment laws or rules. 782
(B) As used in this section, "replica motor vehicle" means 783
a replica motor vehicle for which a certificate of title is 784
issued under section 4505.072 of the Revised Code. 785

H. B. No. 70 Page 28
As Introduced
Sec. 4513.41. (A) No owner of a licensed collector's 786
vehicle, a historical motor vehicle, a replica motor vehicle, or 787
a collector's vehicle that is an agricultural tractor or 788
traction engine shall be required to comply with an emission, 789
noise control, or fuel usage provision contained in a law or 790
rule of this state or its political subdivisions that was 791
enacted or adopted subsequent to the calendar year in which the 792
vehicle was manufactured or the calendar year that it 793
replicates. 794
(B) No person shall be prohibited from operating a 795
licensed collector's vehicle, a historical motor vehicle, a 796
replica motor vehicle, or a collector's vehicle that is an 797
agricultural tractor or traction engine for failing to comply 798
with an emission, noise control, or fuel usage law or rule of 799
this state or its political subdivisions that was enacted or 800
adopted subsequent to the calendar year in which his vehicle was 801
manufactured or the calendar year that it replicates. 802
(C) Except as provided in section 4505.061 of the Revised 803
Code, no person shall be required to submit his the person's 804
collector's vehicle to a physical inspection prior to or in 805
connection with an issuance of title to, or the sale or transfer 806
of ownership of such vehicle, except that a police officer may 807
inspect it to determine ownership. 808
In accordance with section 1.51 of the Revised Code, this 809
section shall, without exception, prevail over any special or 810
local provision of the Revised Code that requires owners or 811
operators of collector's vehicles to comply with standards of 812
emission, noise, fuel usage, or physical condition in connection 813
with an issuance of title to, or the sale or transfer of 814
ownership of such vehicle or part thereof. 815

H. B. No. 70 Page 29
As Introduced
(D) As used in this section, "replica motor vehicle" means 816
a replica motor vehicle for which a certificate of title is 817
issued under section 4505.072 of the Revised Code. 818
Section 2. That existing sections 4501.01, 4505.08, 819
4513.071, 4513.38, and 4513.41 of the Revised Code are hereby 820
repealed. 821
Section 3. Sections 1 and 2 of this act take effect one 822
hundred eighty days after the effective date of this section. 823